Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4028.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to require certain providers of electric service to establish and recover costs for renewable energy and clean energy programs; to require certain providers of electric or natural gas service to establish, and recover costs for, energy waste reduction programs; to ensure that any energy cost costs and savings from renewable energy, clean energy, and energy waste reduction programs are ultimately returned to customers; included in the determination of rates; to authorize the use of certain energy systems to meet the requirements of those programs; to provide for the approval of energy waste reduction service companies; to reduce energy waste by state agencies and the public; to create a wind energy resource zone board and provide for its power and duties; to authorize the creation and implementation of wind energy resource zones; to provide for expedited transmission line siting certificates; to provide for customer generation and net metering programs and the responsibilities of certain providers of electric service and customers with respect to customer generation and net metering; to provide for fees; to prescribe the powers and duties of certain state agencies and officials; to require the promulgation of rules and the issuance of orders; to authorize the establishment of residential energy improvement programs by providers of electric or natural gas service; to authorize certification by this state before the construction of certain wind and solar energy facilities and energy storage facilities; to regulate certain local ordinances; and to provide for civil sanctions, remedies, and penalties. Sec. 13. As used in this act: (a) "Site" means , except as used in part 8, a contiguous site, regardless of the number of meters at that site. A site that would be contiguous but for the presence of a street, road, or highway is considered to be contiguous for the purposes of this subdivision. (b) "Transmission line" means all structures, equipment, and real property necessary to transfer electricity at system bulk supply voltage of 100 kilovolts or more. (c) "Utility system resource cost test" means a standard that is met for an investment in energy waste reduction if, on a life cycle basis, using a real societal discount rate based on actual long-term United States treasury bond yields, the total avoided supply-side costs to the provider, including representative values for electricity or natural gas supply, transmission, distribution, and other associated costs, are greater than the total costs to the provider of administering and delivering the energy waste reduction program, including net costs for any provider incentives paid by customers and capitalized costs recovered under section 89. (d) "Wind energy conversion system" means a system that uses 1 or more wind turbines to generate electricity and has a nameplate capacity of 100 kilowatts or more. (e) "Wind energy resource zone" or "wind zone" means an area designated by the commission under section 147. Enacting section 1. Part 8 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1221 to 460.1232, is repealed. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4027 (request no. H00005'25 a) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.